Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.030

Theft in the first degree.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5323-S.SL) ***

(1) Except as provided in RCW 9A.56.400, a person is guilty of theft in the first degree if he or she commits theft of:

(a) Property or services which exceed(s) five thousand dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010;

(b) Property of any value, other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 or a motor vehicle, taken from the person of another;

(c) A search and rescue dog, as defined in RCW 9.91.175, while the search and rescue dog is on duty; or

(d) Commercial metal property, nonferrous metal property, or private metal property, as those terms are defined in *RCW 19.290.010, and the costs of the damage to the owner's property exceed five thousand dollars in value.

(2) Theft in the first degree is a class B felony.

[ 2017 c 266 s 10; 2013 c 322 s 2; 2012 c 233 s 2; 2009 c 431 s 7; 2007 c 199 s 3; 2005 c 212 s 2; 1995 c 129 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 159); 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.030.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 19.290.010 was amended by 2024 c 301 s 3, deleting the definition of "private metal property," effective April 1, 2025.

Finding—Intent—2017 c 266: See note following RCW 9A.42.020.

Applicability—2009 c 431: See note following RCW 4.24.230.

Findings—Intent—Short title—2007 c 199: See notes following RCW 9A.56.065.

Findings and intent—Short title—Severability—Captions not law—1995 c 129: See notes following RCW 9.94A.510.

Civil action for shoplifting by adults, minors: RCW 4.24.230.

Property crime database, liability: RCW 4.24.340.